languages/apertium-nog/tests/ger1.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] some case forms of <ger1> with м":
    шоршы<v><iv><ger1><dat> : шоршымага
    туьрлен<v><iv><ger1><dat> : туьрленмеге
    куллан<v><tv><ger1><dat> : кулланмага
    тур<v><iv><ger1><dat> : турмага
    бол<v><iv><ger1><dat> : болмага

  "[twol] some case forms of <ger1> with б":
    сез<v><tv><ger1><dat> : сезбеге

  "[twol] some case forms of <ger1> with п":
    кес<v><tv><ger1><dat> : кеспеге
